Hawaii statutes.
§671-20 Annual report. The director of
commerce and consumer affairs shall prepare and submit to the legislature
annually, twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session, a report
containing the director's evaluation of the operation and effects of this
chapter. The report shall include a summary of the inquiries brought before
the medical inquiry and conciliation panel and the disposition of those
inquiries, a description and summary of the work of the panel under this
chapter, an appraisal of the effectiveness of this chapter in securing prompt
and fair disposition of inquiries regarding the rendering of professional
services by health care providers that involved injury, death, or other damages
to a patient, a review of the number and outcomes of inquiries brought under
section 671-12, and recommendations for changes, modifications, or repeal of
this chapter or parts thereof with accompanying reasons and data. [L 1976, c
219, pt of §2; am L 1982, c 204, §8; am L 1983, c 124, §17; gen ch 1985; am L
2012, c 296, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next